Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 5. Beer Keg Registration

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 41, § 2, makes the act effective January 1, 2007.

§ 12-2-501.
Definition. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 41, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-2-502.
Sale of beer kegs. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 41, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; repealed by 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-2-503.
Licensee to keep records. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 41, § 1; 2013 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-2-504.
Access to records. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 41, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; repealed by 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-2-505.
Violation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 41, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.